Oklahoma, session 2025, SB771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature of the State of Oklahoma finds and declares:


1. Direct-to-consumer (DTC) advertising has the potential to


exploit lay understanding of medical science, exposing the public to


persuasive marketing tactics that may compromise informed decision-


making, mislead consumers by underplaying risks, and cause undue


burden on physicians’ prescribing practices; and


2. Past instances of misleading DTC pharmaceutical advertising


have resulted in immense harm to public health such as the


aggressive advertising campaigns for OxyContin, Vioxx, and Zyprexa.

Req. No. 1438 Page 1


Purdue Pharma’s OxyContin advertising played a huge part in the


opioid addiction crisis and the company settled with the United


States Department of Justice for Eight Billion Three Hundred Million


Dollars ($8,300,000,000.00) for their role in 2020. In 2019, Purdue


settled with Oklahoma for Two Hundred Seventy Million Dollars


($270,000,000.00);


3. Newly approved medications advertised directly to consumers


may present unknown long-term risks, exposing patients to potential


harm, such as with the Vioxx debacle which resulted in Merck paying


Four Billion Eight Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($4,850,000,000.00)


to end the lawsuits;


4. The United States is one of only two countries globally that


permits DTC pharmaceutical advertising. One hundred ninety-three


out of the world’s one hundred ninety-five countries do not permit


DTC pharmaceutical advertising. Prohibiting this practice would


align Oklahoma with the global norm;


5. The costs of advertising are frequently passed on to


consumers in a field where such advertising is not necessary, with


advertising budgets for some drugs in the hundreds of millions of


dollars, resulting in higher drug prices and imposing financial


burdens on patients and health care systems;


6. DTC advertising could compromise the integrity of the


doctor-patient relationship by creating improper pressure on doctors


to prescribe certain advertised medications. Banning DTC

Req. No. 1438 Page 2


pharmaceutical advertising would encourage better communication and


trust between patients and their health care providers, fostering


informed and responsible medical decision-making;


7. DTC advertising often prioritizes the promotion of lifestyle


medications over essential, life-saving drugs, distorting health


care priorities; and


8. DTC advertising promotes the over-medicalization of common


conditions, often urging consumers to pursue pharmacological


solutions over alternative treatments or lifestyle modifications.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9000 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Direct-to-consumer pharmaceutical advertising” refers to


any promotional communication targeting consumers including, but not


limited to, television, radio, print media, digital platforms, and


social media, that markets prescription drugs; and


2. “Pharmaceutical companies” refers to entities involved in


the research, development, production, or distribution of


prescription drugs.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9001 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 1438 Page 3


A. No pharmaceutical company shall engage in direct-to-consumer


advertising of prescription drugs within this state.


B. Prohibited activities include, but are not limited to:


1. Broadcasting advertisements for prescription drugs via


television, radio, online streaming services, billboards, email,


text messaging, or social media;


2. Publishing advertisements for prescription drugs in print or


digital publications distributed within Oklahoma; and


3. Targeting Oklahoma residents with prescription drug


advertisements through digital or social media platforms.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9002 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any individual or entity violating the provisions of this


act shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony.


B. A felony conviction under this act shall be punishable by a


fine not exceeding Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) or


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a


term not exceeding five (5) years, or by both such fine and


imprisonment.


C. Each instance of prohibited advertising shall constitute a


separate offense.





Req. No. 1438 Page 4


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9003 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall not apply to:


1. Educational materials distributed by health care providers


directly to their patients;


2. Internal communications within health care organizations;


3. Communications required by federal or state law;


4. Advertisements related to public health campaigns that


educate the public about medication, treatments, and health


conditions, provided they are not promoting a specific


pharmaceutical product;


5. Advertisements that promote clinical trials or other


research opportunities related to prescription drugs, provided that


they comply with ethical and legal standards and are not promoting


the use of the drug outside of a controlled trial setting;


6. Advertisements that inform consumers about insurance


coverage for prescription drugs, such as coverage options through


Medicaid, Medicare, or private insurers, provided these


advertisements do not directly promote specific drugs or brands; or


7. Advertisements or communications related to patient


assistance programs that provide financial support or subsidies for


individuals who are unable to afford their medications, provided


these communications are not directly promoting a specific product.

Req. No. 1438 Page 5


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 7. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1438 DC 1/19/2025 5:43:01 AM



































Req. No. 1438 Page 6